Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1474.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 11, chapter 7, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-1052, to read: START_STATUTE11-1052. Federal immigration authorities; agreements; state cooperation; incentive programs; grant funding; attorney general investigations; definitions a. an OFFICIAL OR AGENCy OF THIS STATE or a county, city, town or OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE may ENTER INTO MEMORANDUMS OF AGREEMENT WITH THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE, THE United States DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY OR ANY OTHER FEDERAL AGENCY FOR THE PURPOSE OF ENFORCING FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAWS, INCLUDING 8 United States Code SECTION 1357(g) OR A SIMILAR FEDERAL PROGRAM. B. On or before JANUARY 1, 2027, EACH county sheriff's office shall ENTER INTO A memorandum of AGREEMENT WITH THE UNITED STATES IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCEMENT TO PARTICIPATE IN THE IMMIGRATION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER 8 United States Code SECTION 1357(g).  THE TERMS OF THE AGREEMENT must SUPPORT THE ENFORCEMENT OF FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAWS. THE AGREEMENT entered into PURSUANT TO 8 United States Code SECTION 1357(g) OR A SIMILAR FEDERAL PROGRAM must do all of the following: 1. BE ENTERED INTO IN ACCORDANCE WITH FEDERAL LAW. 2. include participation by the county sheriff's office in all applicable programs that are available. 3. ALLOW FOR THE ENFORCEMENT OF FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAWS TO THE FULL EXTENT allowED UNDER FEDERAL LAW. C. An official or agency of this state or a city, town, county or other political subdivision of this state may not Establish, adopt or enforce any policy, pattern or practice that prohibits or restricts cooperation with federal immigration authorities in the enforcement of federal immigration law. D. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY FEDERAL LAW, an OFFICIAL OR AGENCy OF THIS STATE or a county, city, town or OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE MAY NOT BE PROHIBITED FROM UsING AVAILABLE FEDERAL RESOURCES, INCLUDING DATABASES, EQUIPMENT, GRANT monieS, TRAINING OR PARTICIPATION IN INCENTIVE PROGRAMS, FOR ANY PUBLIC SAFETY PURPOSE RELATED TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF STATE AND FEDERAL IMMIGRATION LAWS. E. WHEN REASONABLY POSSIBLE, APPLICABLE STATE AGENCIES SHALL CONSIDER INCENTIVE PROGRAMS AND GRANT FUNDING FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING AND ENCOURAGING an official or agency OF THIS STATE or a county, city, town or OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE TO ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS WITH FEDERAL ENTITIES AND TO UsE FEDERAL RESOURCES CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION. F. THIS SECTION OR ANY MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENT AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION does not PREVENT ANY LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, COUNTY, CITY, TOWN OR OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE FROM ENFORCING IMMIGRATION LAWS AS AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO FEDERAL LAWS AND THE LAWS OF THIS STATE. G. A county sheriff's office shall ensure that at least ten percent of the law enforcement officers employed by the county sheriff's office are trained in accordance with the terms of any memorandum of AGREEmENT entered into with the United States immigration and customs enforcement pursuant to subsection B of this section. H. In addition to any other causes of action or remedies available to the attorney general, a county attorney or any other party with standing, at the written request of a member of the legislature, the attorney general shall investigate any ordinance, regulation, order, policy, pattern or practice of a city, town or county or any agency, department or other entity of a city, town or county that the member of the legislature alleges violates subsection C of this section. The attorney general shall have the same investigative powers provided in section 38-431.06, subsection b and may file an action in superior court to enforce compliance with any investigative request or demand.  an action filed by the attorney general pursuant to this subsection shall be given precedence over all OTHER cases.  Within thirty days after the request of the member of the legislature, excluding any time in which an action to enforce an investigative request or demand is pending, the attorney general shall make a written report pursuant to section 41-194.01, subsection b and shall follow the procedures of section 41-194.01, subsection b for any violation or potential violation. I. each Law enforcement agency in this state and each OFFICIAL OR AGENCy OF THIS STATE or a county, city, town or OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE shall provide immigration enforcement training to all law ENFORCEMENT officers and employees to ensure that all immigration enforcement in this state remains consistent with federal law. J. For the purposes of this section: 1. "law enforcement agency" means: (a) A county sheriff's office. (b) THE State department of corrections. (c) The DEPARTMENT of public safety. (d) A municipal police department. 2. "law enforcement officer" means an officer in the employment of a law enforcement agency. END_STATUTE